Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 677.010 is amended to read:
677.010. As used in this chapter, subject to the exemptions in ORS 677.060 and  unless the con-
text requires otherwise:
(1) “Approved internship” means the first year of post-graduate training  served in a hospital
that is approved by the Oregon Medical Board or by the Accreditation Council [ of] for Graduate
Medical Education or its successor  organization , the American Osteopathic Association or its
successor organization  or the Royal College of Physicians and Surgeons of Canada or its  suc-
cessor organization.
(2) “Approved school of medicine” means a school  offering a full-time resident program of study
in medicine or osteopathic medicine leading to a degree of  Doctor of Medicine or Doctor of
Osteopathic Medicine, such program having been fully accredited or conditionally approved  by the
Liaison Committee on Medical Education, or its successor agency, or the  American Osteopathic
Association, or its successor agency,  or having been otherwise determined by the board to meet the
association standards as specifically incorporated into board rules.
[(3) “Board” means the Oregon Medical Board. ]
[(4)] (3) “Diagnose” means to examine another person in any manner to determine the source
or nature of a disease or other physical or mental condition, or  to hold oneself out or represent that
a person is so examining another person. It is not  necessary that the examination be made in the
presence of such other person; [ it] the examination  may be  made on information supplied either
directly or indirectly by such other person.
[(5)] (4) “Dispense” means  the preparation and delivery of a prescription drug, pursuant to a
lawful order of a  practitioner, in a suitable container appropriately labeled for subsequent adminis-
tration to or use by a patient or other individual entitled to receive the prescription drug.
[(6)] (5) “Dispensing physician” means a physician or podiatric physician and  surgeon who pur-
chases prescription drugs for the  purpose of dispensing them to patients or other individuals entitled
to receive the prescription drug and who dispenses them accordingly.
[(7)] (6) “Drug” means all  medicines and preparations for internal or external use of humans,
intended to be used for the cure, mitigation or  prevention of diseases or abnormalities of humans,
which are recognized  in any published United States Pharmacopoeia or National Formulary, or
otherwise established as a drug.
Enrolled Senate Bill 874 (SB 874-A) Page 1
[(8)] (7) “Fellow” means an individual who  has not qualified under ORS 677.100 (1) and (2) and
who is pursuing some special line of study as part of a supervised program of a  school of medicine,
a hospital approved for internship or residency training, or an institution for medical research  or
education that provides for a period of study under the supervision of  a responsible member of that
hospital or institution, such school, hospital or institution having been approved by the board.
[(9)] (8) “Intern” means an individual who has entered into a hospital  or hospitals for the first
year of post-graduate training.
[(10)] (9) “License” means permission to practice, whether by license, registration or certif-
ication.
[(11)] (10) “Licensee” means an individual holding a valid license issued by the board.
[(12)] (11) “Physical incapacity” means a condition that renders an individual licensed under this
chapter unable to practice under that  license with professional skill and safety by reason of physical
illness or physical deterioration that adversely affects cognition, motor or perceptive skill.
[(13)] (12) “Physician” means a person who holds a degree of Doctor of Medicine or Doctor  of
Osteopathic Medicine, or a  person who holds a degree of Doctor of Podiatric Medicine if the context
in which the term “physician” is used  does not authorize or require the person to practice outside
the scope of a license issued under ORS 677.805 to 677.840.
[(14)] (13) “Podiatric physician and surgeon” means a physician licensed under ORS 677.805 to
677.840 to practice podiatry.
[(15)(a)] (14)(a) “Podiatry” means:
(A) The diagnosis or the medical, physical or surgical treatment of  ailments of the human foot,
ankle and tendons  directly attached to and governing the function of the foot and ankle, and treat-
ment involving the use of a general or  spinal anesthetic if that treatment is performed in a hospital
licensed under ORS 441.025 or in an ambulatory surgical  center licensed by the Oregon Health
Authority and is  under the supervision of or in collaboration with a podiatric physician and surgeon;
(B) Assisting in the performance of surgery, as provided in ORS 677.814; and
(C) The treatment of skin, skin-related structures and subcutaneous masses, and wounds in-
volving skin, skin-related structures and subcutaneous  masses, on the human leg no further proximal
than the tibial tubercle.
(b) “Podiatry” does not include administering general or spinal  anesthetics or the amputation
of the entire foot.
[(16)] (15) “Prescribe” means to direct, order or designate the use  of or manner of using by
spoken or written words or other means.
[(17)] (16) “Resident” means an individual who, after the first year of post-graduate  training, in
order to qualify for some particular specialty in the field of medicine, pursues  a special line of study
as part of a supervised program of a hospital approved by the board.
(17) “Traditional Eastern medicine” means the practice of medicine,  specifically
acupuncture and traditional Chinese medicine, regulated  by this chapter if the medicine is
practiced within the context of a person’s license to practice acupuncture issued  under ORS
677.757 to 677.770.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 677.275 is amended to read:
677.275. Each administrative law  judge conducting hearings on behalf of the Oregon Medical
Board is vested with the full  authority of the board to schedule and conduct hearings on behalf and
in the name of the board on all matters referred by the board,  including issuance of licenses, pro-
ceedings for placing licensees on probation and for suspension and revocation of licenses,  and shall
cause to  be prepared and furnished to the board, for decision thereon by the board, the complete
written transcript  of the record of the hearing. This transcript shall contain all evidence introduced
at the hearing  and all pleas, motions and objections, and all rulings of the administrative law judge.
Each administrative law judge may administer oaths  and issue summonses, notices and subpoenas,
but may not place any licensee on probation or issue, refuse, suspend or revoke a license.
SECTION 3.  ORS 677.757 is amended to read:
677.757. As used in ORS 677.757 to 677.770:
Enrolled Senate Bill 874 (SB 874-A) Page 2
[(1)(a) “Acupuncture”  means an Oriental health care practice used to promote health and to treat
neurological, organic or functional disorders by the stimulation of specific points on the surface of  the
body by the  insertion of needles. “Acupuncture” includes the treatment method of moxibustion, as well
as the use of electrical, thermal, mechanical  or magnetic devices, with or without needles, to stimulate
acupuncture points and acupuncture meridians and to induce acupuncture anesthesia or analgesia. ]
[(b) The practice of acupuncture also includes  the following modalities as authorized by the Oregon
Medical Board: ]
[(A) Traditional and modern techniques of diagnosis and evaluation; ]
[(B) Oriental massage, exercise and related therapeutic methods; and ]
[(C) The use of Oriental pharmacopoeia, vitamins, minerals and dietary advice. ]
(1) “Acupuncture” means:
(a) Traditional Eastern medicine used to promote health and treat  neurological, organic
or functional disorders through the insertion of needles into specific points on the body at
varying depths, including insertion into the skin, subcutaneous tissue, muscle layers  and
fascia, and into or near joint spaces based on anatomical location  and the practitioner’s
clinical assessment. The type of needle  inserted, and the depth, angle and technique of in-
sertion, are informed by specialized training in acupuncture  theory, biomedical anatomy and
diagnostic evaluation to safely stimulate biological and physiological responses and  support
the body’s healing process.
(b) The treatment method of moxibustion  and the use of electrical, thermal, mechanical
or magnetic devices, with or without needles, to stimulate acupuncture  points and
acupuncture meridians and to induce acupuncture anesthesia or analgesia.
(c) The following modalities, as authorized by the Oregon Medical Board:
(A) Traditional Eastern medicine and acupuncture  techniques of diagnosis and evalu-
ation;
(B) Traditional Eastern medicine manual therapy,  exercise and related therapeutic
methods; and
(C) The use of Traditional Eastern medicine pharmacopoeia, vitamins,  minerals and
dietary advice.
(2) [ “Oriental  pharmacopoeia” ] “Traditional Eastern medicine pharmacopoeia”  means a list
of herbs described in [ traditional Oriental ] Traditional Eastern medicine  texts commonly used in
accredited schools of [ Oriental] Traditional Eastern  medicine if the texts are approved by  the
Oregon Medical Board.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 677.759 is amended to read:
677.759. (1) [ No person shall ] A person may not  practice acupuncture without first obtaining
a license to practice medicine and surgery or a  license to practice acupuncture from the Oregon
Medical Board except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Notwithstanding  subsection (1) of this section, the board may issue a license to practice
acupuncture to an individual licensed  to practice acupuncture in another state or territory of the
United States if the individual is licensed to practice medicine  and surgery or acupuncture in the
other state or territory. The board  [ shall] may not issue such a license unless the requirements of
the other state or territory are similar to the requirements of this state.
(3) The board shall examine the qualifications of an applicant and  determine who shall be au-
thorized to practice acupuncture.
(4) Using the term “acupuncture,” “acupuncturist,” [ “Oriental  medicine” ] “Traditional Eastern
medicine”  or any other  term, title, name or abbreviation indicating that an individual is qualified
or licensed to practice acupuncture is prima facie evidence of practicing acupuncture.
(5) In addition to the powers and duties of  the board described in this chapter, the board shall
adopt rules  consistent with ORS 677.757 to 677.770 governing the issuance of a license to practice
acupuncture.
SECTION 5.  ORS 677.761 is amended to read:
677.761. Nothing in ORS 677.757 to 677.770 is intended to:
Enrolled Senate Bill 874 (SB 874-A) Page 3
(1) Prevent, limit or interfere with an individual licensed or certified by the Oregon Medical
Board from practicing health care other than acupuncture within the scope of the license or certif-
ication of the individual.
(2) Limit  any other licensed or certified health care practitioner from practicing acupressure
or other therapy within the scope of the license or certification of the individual.
(3) Limit the activities of any person  who engages in the business of providing [ Oriental
massage] Traditional Eastern medicine manual therapy, exercise and related therapeutic methods
or who provides substances  listed in [ an Oriental ] Traditional Eastern medicine  pharmacopoeia,
or vitamins or minerals or dietary advice, so long as the activities  of the person are not otherwise
prohibited by law.
(4) Limit the ability of practitioners  from outside Oregon to demonstrate the practice of
acupuncture as part of a recognized and limited duration educational  program, lecture or event
within this state under rules adopted by the board.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 677.780 is amended to read:
677.780. (1) There is established an Acupuncture Advisory Committee consisting  of six members
appointed by the Oregon Medical Board. Of the committee members appointed by the board:
(a) One shall be a person who is a current member of the board.
(b) Two shall be physicians licensed under ORS chapter 677.
(c) Three shall be  acupuncturists licensed under ORS [ 677.759] 677.757 to 677.770. In appointing
the three acupuncturists, the board may receive nominations from the [ Oregon Association of
Acupuncture and Oriental Medicine ] Oregon Association  of Acupuncturists, or its successor
organization, and other professional acupuncture organizations.
(2) The term of office  of each committee member is three years, but a committee member serves
at the pleasure of the board. A committee member may not serve more than  two consecutive terms.
A committee member serves until a successor  is appointed and qualified. If there is a vacancy for
any cause, the board shall make an appointment to become  immediately effective for the unexpired
term.
(3) A committee member is entitled to compensation  and expenses as provided for board mem-
bers in ORS 677.235.
(4) A majority of the  members of the committee constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
business.
Enrolled Senate Bill 874 (SB 874-A) Page 4
Passed by Senate March 11, 2025
Repassed by Senate June 9, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 3, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 874 (SB 874-A) Page 5